New York, session 2025-2026, S5982.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 9-1709 of the environmental conservation law is 2 amended by adding a new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the 4 contrary, the department shall have the authority to independently add 5 to the lists of prohibited and regulated invasive species on an emergen- 6 cy basis pending review by the department of agriculture and markets in 7 consultation with the council. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 9 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00137-01-5